Florida, session 2026, SB1192.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âPresent subsections (5) through (8) of section 15 23.30, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6) 16 through (9), respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added to 17 that section, to read: 18 23.30âFlorida Customer Service Standards Act.â 19 (5)âPILOT PROGRAMS.â 20 (a)âAs used in this subsection, the term âcallback queueâ 21 means a system that allows a caller to leave a telephone number 22 at which he or she can be reached at a later time rather than 23 receiving no answer to his or her call or remaining on hold. 24 (b)âA pilot program is implemented to require a callback 25 queue to be used: 26 1.âBy the Department of Commerce in returning calls from 27 claimants concerning reemployment assistance. 28 2.âBy the Department of Children and Families in returning 29 calls concerning public benefits and services. 30 (c)âAll calls must be returned, in the order in which 31 received, by the end of the next business day. 32 (d)âOn or before December 31, 2027, any department that 33 participates in the pilot program must submit a report to the 34 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 35 Representatives which includes information concerning the 36 effectiveness of the pilot program, any suggested changes to the 37 program, and a recommendation as to whether the program should 38 be continued or expanded. 39 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.